District of Columbia statutes.
29-607.02

Dissociated partner’s power to bind and liability to partnership.

(a)

For 2 years after a partner dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, the partnership, including a surviving partnership under subchapter IX of this chapter, shall be bound by an act of the dissociated partner which would have bound the partnership under § 29-603.01 before dissociation only if at the time of entering into the transaction the other party:

(1)

Reasonably believed that the dissociated partner was then a partner;

(2)

Did not have notice of the partner’s dissociation; and

(3)

Is not deemed to have had knowledge under § 29-603.03(e) or notice under § 29-607.04(c).

(b)

A dissociated partner shall be liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from a debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by the dissociated partner after dissociation for which the partnership is liable under subsection (a) of this section.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(7)(A), 59 DCR 13171

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 702 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “’a debt, obligation, or other liability” for “an obligation” in (b).
2001 Ed., § 33-107.02.
1981 Ed., § 41-157.2.
This section is referenced in § 29-607.01, § 29-607.04, and § 29-609.03.